Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.0257

"Lottery."

"Lottery," as used in this chapter, means a scheme for the distribution of money or property by chance, among persons who have paid or agreed to pay a valuable consideration for the chance.

[ 1987 c 4 s 15. Formerly RCW 9.46.020(14).]